Maine, session 132, LD1075.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4741, sub-§15, as amended by PL 2009, c. 372, Pt. B, §2, is
further amended to read:
15. State weatherization, conservation and fuel assistance agency. The Maine
State Housing Authority is designated the weatherization, energy conservation and fuel
assistance agency for the State and, in accordance with Title 35‑A, section 10104,
subsection 8, may apply for, receive, distribute and administer federal funds on behalf of
the State for weatherization, energy conservation and fuel assistance pursuant to the
Weatherization Assistance for Low-income Persons Program administered through the
United States Department of Energy and the Low-income Home Energy Assistance
Program administered through the United States Department of Health and Human
Services in accordance with rules adopted under the Maine Administrative Procedure Act;.
Beginning in 2026, the Maine State Housing Authority shall report annually to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing and economic
development matters on the Low-income Home Energy Assistance Program administered
through the United States Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with
Title 35-A, section 10104, subsection 8. The report must be for the fiscal year that
corresponds to the year funds were allocated and must include total funds disbursed,
amount of funds disbursed by fuel type, administrative costs to manage the program, a
detailed list of all funding sources and the total number of recipients of assistance by
county;